California statutes. Labor Code
-------------------------------------------

2779.

(a)Section 2775 and the holding in Dynamex do not apply to the relationship between two individuals wherein each individual is acting as a sole proprietor or separate business entity formed as a partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation performing work pursuant to a contract for purposes of providing services at the location of a single-engagement event, as defined below, under the following conditions:

(1) Neither individual is subject to control and direction by the other, in connection with the performance of the work, both under the contract for the performance of the work and in fact.

(2) Each individual has the ability to negotiate their rate of pay with the other individual.

(3) The written contract between both individuals specifies the total payment for
 services provided by both individuals at the single-engagement event, and the specific rate paid to each individual.

(4) Each individual maintains their own business location, which may include the individual’s personal residence.

(5) Each individual provides their own tools, vehicles, and equipment to perform the services under the contract.

(6) If the work is performed in a jurisdiction that requires an individual to have a business license or business tax registration, then each individual has the required business license or business tax registration.

(7) Each individual is customarily engaged in the same or similar type of work performed under the contract or each individual separately holds themselves out to other potential customers as available to perform the same type of work.

(8) Each individual can contract with other businesses to provide the same or similar
 services and maintain their own clientele without restrictions.

(b) “Single-engagement event” means a stand-alone non-recurring event in a single location, or a series of events in the same location no more than once a week.

(c) “Services” under this section do not include services provided in an industry designated by the Division of Occupational Safety and Health or the Department of Industrial Relations as a high hazard industry pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 6401.7 or janitorial, delivery, courier, transportation, trucking, agricultural labor, retail, logging, in-home care, or construction services other than minor home repair.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 38, Sec. 2.   (AB 2257)   Effective September 4, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2780.

(a) (1) Section 2775 and the holding in Dynamex do not apply to the following occupations in connection with creating, marketing, promoting, or distributing sound recordings or musical compositions, and instead the holding in Borello shall apply to all of the following:

(A) Recording artists, subject to the below.

(B) Songwriters, lyricists, composers, and proofers.

(C) Managers of recording artists.

(D) Record producers and directors.

(E) Musical engineers and mixers engaged in the creation of sound recordings.

(F) Musicians engaged in the creation of sound recordings, subject to the below.

(G) Vocalists, subject to the below.

(H) Photographers working on recording photo shoots, album covers, and other press and publicity purposes.

(I) Independent radio promoters.

(J) Any other individual engaged to render any creative, production, marketing, or independent music publicist services related primarily to the creation, marketing, promotion, or distribution of sound recordings or musical compositions.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply to any of the following:

(A) Film and television unit production crews, as such term is commonly used in the film and television industries, working on live or recorded performances for audiovisual works, including still photographers and cinematographers.

(B) Publicists who are not independent music publicists.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 2775, paragraphs (1) and (2), and the holding in Dynamex, the terms and conditions of
 any current or future collective bargaining agreements or contractual agreements between the applicable labor unions and respective employers shall govern the determination of employment status in all events.

(4) The following shall apply to recording artists, musicians, and vocalists:

(A) Recording artists, musicians, and vocalists shall not be precluded from organizing under applicable provisions of labor law, or otherwise exercising rights granted to employees under the National Labor Relations Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.).

(B) (i) Musicians and vocalists who are not royalty-based participants in the work created during any specific engagement shall be treated as employees solely for purposes of receiving minimum and overtime wages for hours worked during the engagement, as well as any damages and penalties due to the failure to receive minimum or overtime wages. Any such wages, damages, and
 penalties owed under this subparagraph shall be determined according to the applicable provisions of this code, wage orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission, or applicable local laws.

(ii) “Royalty-based participant” means an individual who has either negotiated for the collection or direct administration of royalties derived from the exploitation of a sound recording or musical composition, or is entitled to control, administer or collect royalties related to the exploitation of a sound recording or musical composition as a co-author or joint owner thereof.

(C) In all events, and notwithstanding subparagraph (B), the terms and conditions of any current or future collective bargaining agreements or contractual agreements between the applicable labor unions and respective employers shall govern the determination of employment status.

(b) (1) Section 2775 and the holding in Dynamex do not apply to a
 musician or musical group for the purpose of a single-engagement live performance event, and instead the determination of employee or independent contractor status shall be governed by Borello, unless one of the following conditions is met:

(A) The musical group is performing as a symphony orchestra, the musical group is performing at a theme park or amusement park, or a musician is performing in a musical theater production.

(B) The musical group is an event headliner for a performance taking place in a venue location with more than 1,500 attendees.

(C) The musical group is performing at a festival that sells more than 18,000 tickets per day.

(2) This subdivision is inclusive of rehearsals related to the single-engagement live performance event.

(3) As used in this subdivision:

(A) “Event headliner” means the musical group that appears most
 prominently in an event program, advertisement, or on a marquee.

(B) “Festival” means a single day or multiday event in a single venue location that occurs once a year, featuring performances by various musical groups.

(C) “Musical group” means a solo artist, band, or a group of musicians who perform under a distinct name.

(D) “Musical theater production” means a form of theatrical performance that combines songs, spoken dialogue, acting, and dance.

(E) “Musician” means an individual performing instrumental, electronic, or vocal music in a live setting.

(F) “Single-engagement live performance event” means a stand-alone musical performance in a single venue location, or a series of performances in the same venue location no more than once a week. This does not include performances that are part of a tour or series of live performances at various locations.

(G) “Venue location” means an indoor or outdoor location used primarily as a space to hold a concert or musical performance. “Venue location” includes, but is not limited to, a restaurant, bar, or brewery that regularly offers live musical entertainment.

(c) Section 2775 and the holding in Dynamex do not apply to the following, and instead, the determination of employee or independent contractor status shall be governed by Borello:

(1) An individual performance artist performing material that is their original work and creative in character and the result of which depends primarily on the individual’s invention, imagination, or talent, given all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The individual is free from the control and direction of the hiring entity in connection with the performance of the work, both as a matter of contract and in fact. This includes, and is not limited to, the right for the
 performer to exercise artistic control over all elements of the performance.

(B) The individual retains the rights to their intellectual property that was created in connection with the performance.

(C) Consistent with the nature of the work, the individual sets their terms of work and has the ability to set or negotiate their rates.

(D) The individual is free to accept or reject each individual performance engagement without being penalized in any form by the hiring entity.

(2) “Individual performance artist” shall include, but is not limited to, an individual performing comedy, improvisation, stage magic, illusion, mime, spoken word, storytelling, or puppetry.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to an individual participating in a theatrical production, or a musician or musical group as defined in subdivision (b).

(4) In all events,
 notwithstanding paragraph (1), the terms and conditions of any current or future collective bargaining agreements or contractual agreements between the applicable labor unions and respective employer shall govern the determination of employment status.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 38, Sec. 2.   (AB 2257)   Effective September 4, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2781.

Section 2775 and the holding in Dynamex do not apply to the relationship between a contractor and an individual performing work pursuant to a subcontract in the construction industry, and instead the determination of whether the individual is an employee of the contractor shall be governed by Section 2750.5 and by Borello, if the contractor demonstrates that all the following criteria are satisfied:

(a) The subcontract is in writing.

(b) The subcontractor is licensed by the Contractors State License Board and the work is within the scope of that license.

(c) If the subcontractor is domiciled in a jurisdiction that requires the subcontractor to have a business
 license or business tax registration, the subcontractor has the required business license or business tax registration.

(d) The subcontractor maintains a business location that is separate from the business or work location of the contractor.

(e) The subcontractor has the authority to hire and to fire other persons to provide or to assist in providing the services.

(f) The subcontractor assumes financial responsibility for errors or omissions in labor or services as evidenced by insurance, legally authorized indemnity obligations, performance bonds, or warranties relating to the labor or services being provided.

(g) The subcontractor is customarily engaged in an independently established business of the same nature as that involved in the work
 performed.

(h) (1) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to a subcontractor providing construction trucking services for which a contractor’s license is not required by Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, provided that all of the following criteria are satisfied:

(A) The subcontractor is a business entity formed as a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation.

(B) For work performed after January 1, 2020, the subcontractor is registered with the Department of Industrial Relations as a public works contractor pursuant to Section 1725.5, regardless of whether the subcontract involves public work.

(C) The subcontractor
 utilizes its own employees to perform the construction trucking services, unless the subcontractor is a sole proprietor who operates their own truck to perform the entire subcontract and holds a valid motor carrier permit issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(D) The subcontractor negotiates and contracts with, and is compensated directly by, the licensed contractor.

(2) For work performed after January 1, 2020, any business entity that provides construction trucking services to a licensed contractor utilizing more than one truck shall be deemed the employer for all drivers of those trucks.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “construction trucking services” mean hauling and trucking services provided in the construction industry pursuant to a contract with a licensed contractor utilizing vehicles that
 require a commercial driver’s license to operate or have a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,001 or more pounds.

(4) This subdivision shall only apply to work performed before January 1, 2025.

(5) Nothing in this subdivision prohibits an individual who owns their truck from working as an employee of a trucking company and utilizing that truck in the scope of that employment. An individual employee providing their own truck for use by an employer trucking company shall be reimbursed by the trucking company for the reasonable expense incurred for the use of the employee-owned truck.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 422, Sec. 2.   (AB 1561)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.

(a) Section 2775 and the holding in Dynamex do not apply to the relationship between a data aggregator and a research subject, and instead the holding in Borello shall apply, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The research subject is free from control and direction with respect to the substance and content of the feedback.

(2) The nature of the feedback requested requires the research subject to exercise independent judgment and discretion.

(3) The research subject has the ability to reject feedback requests, without being penalized in any form by the data aggregator.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Data aggregator” is a business, research institution, or organization that requests and gathers feedback on user interface, products, services, people, concepts, ideas, offerings, or experiences from research subjects willing to provide it.

(2) “Research subject” is any person who willingly engages with a data aggregator in order to provide individualized feedback on user interface, products, services, people, concepts, ideas, offerings, or experiences, and does not engage solely for the purposes of completing individual tasks, except as the tasks relate to providing such feedback.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 422, Sec. 3.   (AB 1561)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2783.

Section 2775 and the holding in Dynamex do not apply to the following occupations as defined in the paragraphs below, and instead, the determination of employee or independent contractor status for individuals in those occupations shall be governed by Borello:

(a) A person or organization that is licensed by the Department of Insurance pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760), or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1831) of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code or a person who provides underwriting inspections, premium audits, risk management, claims adjusting, third-party administration consistent with use of the term “third-party administrator,”
 as defined in subdivision (cc) of Section 10112.1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, or loss control work for the insurance and financial service industries.

(b) A physician and surgeon, dentist, podiatrist, psychologist, or veterinarian licensed by the State of California pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, performing professional or medical services provided to or by a health care entity, including an entity organized as a sole proprietorship, partnership, or professional corporation as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code. Nothing in this subdivision shall circumvent, undermine, or restrict the rights under federal law to organize and collectively bargain.

(c) An individual who holds an active license
 from the State of California and is practicing one of the following recognized professions: lawyer, architect, landscape architect, engineer, private investigator, or accountant.

(d) A securities broker-dealer or investment adviser or their agents and representatives that are either of the following:

(1) Registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission or the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority.

(2) Licensed by the State of California under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 25210) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 25230) of Division 1 of Part 3 of Title 4 of the Corporations Code.

(e) A direct sales salesperson as described in Section 650 of the
 Unemployment Insurance Code, so long as the conditions for exclusion from employment under that section are met.

(f) A manufactured housing salesperson, subject to all obligations under Part 2 (commencing with Section 18000) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, including all regulations promulgated by the Department of Housing and Community Development relating to manufactured home salespersons and all other obligations of manufactured housing salespersons to members of the public. The statutorily imposed duties of a manufactured housing dealer under Section 18060.5 of the Health and Safety Code are not factors to be considered under the Borello test.

(g) A commercial fisher working on an American vessel.

(1) For the purposes of this subdivision:

(A) “American vessel” has the same meaning as defined in Section 125.5 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(B) “Commercial fisher” means a person who has a valid, unrevoked commercial fishing license issued pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 7850) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 6 of the Fish and Game Code.

(C) “Working on an American vessel” means the taking or the attempt to take fish, shellfish, or other fishery resources of the state by any means, and includes each individual aboard an American vessel operated for fishing purposes who participates directly or indirectly in the taking of these raw fishery products, including maintaining the vessel or
 equipment used aboard the vessel. However, “working on an American vessel” does not apply to anyone aboard a licensed commercial fishing vessel as a visitor or guest who does not directly or indirectly participate in the taking.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, a commercial fisher working on an American vessel is eligible for unemployment insurance benefits if they meet the definition of “employment” in Section 609 of the Unemployment Insurance Code and are otherwise eligible for those benefits pursuant to the provisions of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before March 1, 2021, and each
 June 30 thereafter, the Employment Development Department shall issue an annual report to the Legislature on the use of unemployment insurance in the commercial fishing industry. This report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(i) Reporting the number of commercial fishers who apply for unemployment insurance benefits.

(ii) The number of commercial fishers who have their claims disputed.

(iii) The number of commercial fishers who have their claims denied.

(iv) The number of commercial fishers who receive unemployment insurance benefits.

(B) The report required by this subparagraph shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(4) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1,
 2031, unless extended by the Legislature.

(h) (1) A newspaper distributor working under contract with a newspaper publisher, as defined in paragraph (2), or a newspaper carrier.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) “Newspaper” means a newspaper of general circulation, as defined in Section 6000 or 6008 of the Government Code, and any other publication circulated to the community in general as an extension of or substitute for that newspaper’s own publication, whether that publication be designated a “shoppers’ guide,” as a zoned edition, or otherwise. “Newspaper” may also be a publication that is published in print and that may be posted in a digital format, and distributed
 periodically at daily, weekly, or other short intervals, for the dissemination of news of a general or local character and of a general or local interest.

(B) “Publisher” means the natural or corporate person that manages the newspaper’s business operations, including circulation.

(C) “Newspaper distributor” means a person or entity that contracts with a publisher to distribute newspapers to the community.

(D) “Newspaper carrier” means a person who effects physical delivery of the newspaper to the customer or reader, who is not working as an app-based driver, as defined in Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 7448) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, during the time when the newspaper carrier is
 performing the newspaper delivery services.

(3) (A) On or before March 1, 2025, March 1, 2026, March 1, 2027, March 1, 2028, and March 1, 2029, every newspaper publisher or distributor that hires or directly contracts with newspaper carriers shall submit to the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, in a manner prescribed by the agency and in conformity with existing law, the following information related to their workforce for the current year:

(i) The number of carriers for which the publisher or distributor paid payroll taxes in the previous year and the number of carriers for which the publisher or distributor did not pay payroll taxes in the previous year.

(ii) The average wage rate paid to
 carriers classified as independent contractors and as employees.

(iii) The number of carrier wage claims filed, if any, with the Labor Commissioner or in a court of law.

(B) For the March 1, 2025, reporting date only, every newspaper publisher and distributor shall also report the number of carrier wage claims filed with the Labor Commissioner or in a court of law for the preceding three years.

(C) Information that is submitted shall only be disclosed in accordance with Section 7927.705 of the Government Code, relating to trade secrets or other proprietary business information.

(4) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2030, unless
 extended by the Legislature.

(i) An individual who is engaged by an international exchange visitor program that has obtained and maintains full official designation by the United States Department of State under Part 62 (commencing with Section 62.1) of Title 22 of the Code of
 Federal Regulations for the purpose of conducting, instead of participating in, international and cultural exchange visitor programs and is in full compliance with Part 62 (commencing with Section 62.1) of Title 22 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(j) A competition judge with a specialized skill set or expertise providing services that require the exercise of discretion and independent judgment to an organization for the purposes of determining the outcome or enforcing the rules of a competition. This includes, but is not limited to, an amateur umpire or referee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 305, Sec. 2.   (AB 1514)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2784.

Section 2775 and the holding in Dynamex do not apply to the relationship between a motor club holding a certificate of authority issued pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12160) of Part 5 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code and an individual performing services pursuant to a contract between the motor club and a third party to provide motor club services utilizing the employees and vehicles of the third party and, instead, the determination of whether such an individual is an employee of the motor club shall be governed by Borello, if the motor club demonstrates that the third party is a separate and independent business from the motor club.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 38, Sec. 2.   (AB 2257)   Effective September 4, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2785.

(a) Section 2775 does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law with regard to wage orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission and violations of this code relating to wage orders.

(b) Insofar as the application of Sections 2776 to Section 2784 would relieve an employer from liability, those sections shall apply retroactively to existing claims and actions to the maximum extent permitted by law.

(c) Except as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section, this article shall apply to work performed on or after January 1, 2020.

(d) If a hiring entity can demonstrate compliance with all of conditions set forth in any one of Sections 2776 to 2784, inclusive, then Section 2775 and the holding in Dynamex do not apply to that entity, and instead the determination of
 an individual’s employment status as an employee or independent contractor shall be governed by Borello.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 38, Sec. 2.   (AB 2257)   Effective September 4, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2786.

In addition to any other remedies available, an action for injunctive relief to prevent the continued misclassification of employees as independent contractors may be prosecuted against the putative employer in a court of competent jurisdiction by the Attorney General, by a district attorney, or by a city attorney of a city having a population in excess of 750,000, or by a city attorney in a city and county or, with the consent of the district attorney, by a city prosecutor in a city having a full-time city prosecutor in the name of the people of the State of California upon their own complaint or upon the complaint of a board, officer, person, corporation, or association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 38, Sec. 2.   (AB 2257)   Effective September 4, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2787.

The provisions of this Article are severable. If any provision of this Article or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 38, Sec. 2.   (AB 2257)   Effective September 4, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Obligations of Employer [2800. - 2810.8.]

2800.

An employer shall in all cases indemnify his employee for losses caused by the employer’s want of ordinary care.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2800.1.

An employer shall in all cases take reasonable and necessary precautions to safeguard musical instruments and equipment, belonging to an employed musician, located on premises under the employer’s control. In the event such equipment is damaged or stolen as a result of the employer’s failure or refusal to take such reasonable and necessary precautions, the employer shall be liable to the owner for repair or replacement thereof if the employed musician has taken reasonable and necessary precautions to safeguard the musical instruments and equipment.

For the purposes of this section: (a) “employer” includes a purchaser of services and the owner of premises upon which an employed musician is working; and (b) “employee” is any employed musician working on premises which are under an employer’s control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

2800.2.

(a) Any employer, employee association, or other entity otherwise providing hospital, surgical, or major medical benefits to its employees or members is solely responsible for notification of its employees or members of the conversion coverage made available pursuant to Part 6.1 (commencing with Section 12670) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code or Section 1373.6 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Any employer, employee association, or other entity, whether private or public, that provides hospital, medical, or surgical expense coverage that a former employee may continue under Section 4980B of Title 26 of the United States Code, Section 1161 et seq. of Title 29 of the United States Code, or Section 300bb of Title 42 of the United States Code, as added by the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (Public Law 99-272), and as may be later amended (hereafter “COBRA”), shall, in conjunction with the notification required by COBRA that COBRA continuation coverage will cease and conversion coverage is available, and as a part of the notification required by subdivision (a), also notify the former employee, spouse, or former spouse of the availability of the continuation coverage under Section 1373.621 of the Health and Safety Code, and Sections 10116.5 and 11512.03 of the Insurance Code.

(c) On or after July 1, 2006, notification provided to employees, members, former employees, spouses, or former spouses under subdivisions (a) and (b) shall also include the following notification:

“Please examine your options carefully before declining this coverage. You should be aware that companies selling individual health insurance typically require a review of your medical history that could result in a higher premium or you could be denied coverage entirely.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 526, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2800.3.

Any employer, other than a self-insurer, employee association or other entity otherwise providing hospital, surgical or major medical benefits to its employees or members shall also make available conversion coverage which complies with the provisions of Part 6.1 (commencing with Section 12670) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code and Section 1373.6 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1096, Sec. 4.   Operative January 1, 1983, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1096.)
-------------------------------------------

2801.

In any action to recover damages for a personal injury sustained within this State by an employee while engaged in the line of his duty or the course of his employment as such, or for death resulting from personal injury so sustained, in which recovery is sought upon the ground of want of ordinary or reasonable care of the employer, or of any officer, agent or servant of the employer, the fact that such employee has been guilty of contributory negligence shall not bar a recovery therein where his contributory negligence was slight and that of the employer was gross, in comparison, but the damages may be diminished by the jury in proportion to the amount of negligence attributable to such employee.

It shall be conclusively presumed that such employee was not guilty of contributory negligence in any case where the violation of any law enacted for the safety of employees contributed to such employee’s injury.

It shall not be a defense that:

(a) The employee either expressly or impliedly assumed the risk of the hazard complained of.

(b) The injury or death was caused in whole or in part by the want of ordinary or reasonable care of a fellow servant.

No contract, or regulation, shall exempt the employer from any provisions of this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2802.

(a) An employer shall indemnify his or her employee for all necessary expenditures or losses incurred by the employee in direct consequence of the discharge of his or her duties, or of his or her obedience to the directions of the employer, even though unlawful, unless the employee, at the time of obeying the directions, believed them to be unlawful.

(b) All awards made by a court or by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement for reimbursement of necessary expenditures under this section shall carry interest at the same rate as judgments in civil actions. Interest shall accrue from the date on which the employee incurred the necessary expenditure
 or loss.

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “necessary expenditures or losses” shall include all reasonable costs, including, but not limited to, attorney’s fees incurred by the employee enforcing the rights granted by this section.

(d) In addition to recovery of penalties under this section in a court action or proceedings pursuant to Section 98, the commissioner may issue a citation against an employer or other person acting on behalf of the employer who violates reimbursement obligations for an amount determined to be due to an employee under this section. The procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations or civil penalties issued by the commissioner shall be the same as those set forth in Section 1197.1. Amounts recovered pursuant to
 this section shall be paid to the affected employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 783, Sec. 4.   (AB 970)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2802.1.

(a) (1) Section 2802 applies to any expense or cost of any employer-provided or employer-required educational program or training for an employee providing direct patient care or an applicant for direct patient care employment. Those expenses or costs shall constitute a necessary expenditure or loss incurred by the employee in direct consequence of the discharge
 of the employee’s duties, as that phrase is used in Section 2802.

(2) For purposes of this section, “employer-provided or employer-required educational program or training” includes, but is not limited to, residencies, orientations, or competency validations necessary for direct patient care employment. “Employer-provided or employer-required educational program or training” does not include either of the following:

(A) Requirements for a
 license, registration, or certification necessary to legally practice in a specific employee classification to provide direct patient care.

(B) Education or training that is voluntarily undertaken by the employee or applicant solely at their discretion.

(b) An employer, or any person acting on behalf of the employer, shall not retaliate against an applicant for employment or employee for refusing to enter into a contract or agreement that violates subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall only apply to applicants for employment and employees providing direct patient care for an
 employer for a “general acute care hospital,” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) In addition to injunctive relief and any other remedies available, a court shall award, in any action brought pursuant to this section, a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(e) This section is declaratory of and clarifies existing law with
 respect to employer-required training for employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 351, Sec. 2.   (AB 2588)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2802.2.

(a) Section 2802 applies to the use of a vehicle, including a personal vehicle or a commercial vehicle, owned by an employee and used by that employee in the discharge of their duties. This subdivision is declarative of existing law.

(b) (1) With respect to construction trucking, a commercial motor vehicle driver who owns the truck, tractor, trailer, or other commercial vehicle that they use in the discharge of their duties as an employee working for an
 employer is entitled to reimbursement for the use, upkeep, and depreciation of that truck, tractor, trailer, or other commercial vehicle. This subdivision applies whether the vehicle is owned by the driver as an individual or whether the vehicle is owned by the driver through a corporate entity. This paragraph is declarative of existing law.

(2) (A) The amount to be reimbursed for the use of the truck, tractor, or trailer shall be negotiated either by the driver and the employer, or
 by a labor union representing that driver and the employer. The amount negotiated shall be either a flat rate reimbursement or a per-mile reimbursement, but in no case shall the amount negotiated be less than the actual amount expended by the driver for a flat rate reimbursement or less than the standard mileage reimbursement rate set by the Internal Revenue Service for the time the services were provided for a per-mile reimbursement.

(B) An amount owed to a driver under this section may be paid directly to the driver in the driver’s name, or may be paid to a corporate entity owned and controlled by the driver if the truck, tractor, or trailer is owned by the corporate entity rather than by the driver directly.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 659, Sec. 3.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2803.

When death, whether instantaneously or otherwise, results from an injury to an employee caused by the want of ordinary or reasonable care of an employer or of any officer, agent, a servant of the employer, the personal representative of such employee shall have a right of action therefor against such employer, and may recover damages in respect thereof, for and on behalf of the surviving spouse, children, dependent parents, and dependent brothers and sisters, in order of precedence as stated, but no more than one action shall be brought for such recovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1171.)
-------------------------------------------

2803.4.

(a) Any employer providing health benefits under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001, et seq.) shall not provide an exception for other coverage where the other coverage is entitlement to Medi-Cal benefits under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or medicaid benefits under Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code. Any employer providing health benefits under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 shall not provide an exception for the Medi-Cal or medicaid benefits.

(b) Any employer providing health benefits under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 shall not provide that the benefits payable are subject to reduction if the individual insured has entitlement to Medi-Cal or medicaid benefits.

(c) Any employer providing health benefits under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 shall not provide an exception for enrollment for benefits because of an applicant’s entitlement to Medi-Cal benefits under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or medicaid benefits under Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(d) The State Department of Health Services shall consider health benefits available under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 in determining legal liability of any third party for medical expenses incurred by a Medi-Cal or medicaid recipient under Section 14124.90 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 147, Sec. 16.   Effective July 11, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2803.5.
